Utah statutes.
38-3-4.   Attachment -- Affidavit and bond.
The lessor shall before the issue of such writ of attachment file a complaint,
and an affidavit duly sworn to setting forth the amount of rent due over and
above all offsets and counterclaims and a brief description of the leased
premises, and shall further state, under oath that such writ of attachment is
not sued out for the purpose of vexing or harassing the lessee; and the person
applying for such writ of attachment shall execute and file a bond as in other
cases of attachment.
